Maine, session 132, LD893.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §704, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 192, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Health insurance. For purposes of this Title, except as provided in subsection
subsections 2 and subsection, 3 and 4, "health insurance" means insurance of human beings
against bodily injury, disablement or death by accident or accidental means, or the expense
thereof, or against disablement or expense resulting from sickness, and every insurance
appertaining thereto, including provision for the mental and emotional welfare of human
beings by defraying the costs of legal services only to the extent provided for in chapter 38.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §704, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Nonprofit agricultural membership organization. As used in this Title and Title
24, the use of "health insurance" and related terms such as "accident and health insurance,"
"accident and sickness insurance," "carrier," "health," "health benefit plan," "health care,"
"health insurer" or "insurer" do not include, unless specifically provided otherwise in the
law, a nonprofit agricultural membership organization providing health care benefits in
accordance with this subsection, and a nonprofit agricultural membership organization
providing health care benefits in accordance with this subsection may not be considered to
be engaged in the business of insurance for the purposes of this Title.
A. For the purposes of this subsection, "nonprofit agricultural membership
organization" means a statewide nonprofit agricultural membership organization that
is exempt from taxation under the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and that:
(1) Has been in existence continuously since December 31, 1951;
(2) Provides health care benefits coverage for the payment of medical expenses to
or for members of the organization, their dependents and others; and
(3) Conducts an annual audit that is performed by an independent certified public
accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that is
made available to the public upon request.
B. At the time an initial application for coverage for health care benefits is taken with
respect to new applicants and upon renewal of coverage with respect to persons
previously covered, the nonprofit agricultural membership organization shall provide
to the applicant or covered person a written notice stating that:
(1) The coverage is not provided by an insurance company;
(2) The plan is not subject to the laws and rules relating to insurance companies;
(3) The plan is not under the jurisdiction of the superintendent; and
(4) If the plan does not pay medical expenses that are eligible for payment under
the plan for any reason, the individuals covered by the plan may be liable for such
expenses.
Page 1 - 132LR1569(01)